Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.260

Advisory council—Compensation and reimbursement of members.

The directors of the state historical societies shall serve as members of the advisory council on historic preservation without additional compensation. All other members of the advisory council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of the duties of the council in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1983 c 91 s 18.]